Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
INTERMEDIATE APPELLATE COURT

Note

As enacted, the sections in this part were designated
§§602-12 to 602-20.

Rules of Court

See generally Rules of the Intermediate Court of Appeals;
Hawaii Rules of Appellate Procedure; Hawaii Court Records Rules; Hawaii
Electronic Filing and Service Rules.

Law Journals and Reviews

Administering Justice or Just Administration: The Hawai‘i
Supreme Court and the Intermediate Court of Appeals. 14 UH L. Rev. 271 (1992).

Judicial Review and Sexual Freedom. 30 UH L. Rev. 1 (2007).

§602-51 How constituted. The
intermediate appellate court shall consist of a chief judge and five associate
judges. The chief judge, who shall be specifically selected, shall supervise
the administrative duties of the court. [L 1979, c 111, pt of §3; am L 1992, c
253, §2; am L 2001, c 248, §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next